West Virginia, session 2025, HB3138.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 5. Crimes Against the Public Justice. §61-5-30. Bystanders shall stand 25 feet back from first responders engaged in the lawful performance of their duties. (a) As used in this section, the term:(1) "First responder" includes a law enforcement officer as defined in §30-29-1 of this code, a probation officer as described in §62-12-6 of this code, or a firefighter or emergency responder as defined in §5H-1-2 of this code.(2) "Harass" means to willfully engage in a course of conduct directed at a first responder which intentionally causes substantial emotional distress in that first responder and serves no legitimate purpose.(b) It is unlawful for a person, after receiving a verbal warning not to approach from a person he or she knows or reasonably should know is a first responder, who is engaged in the lawful performance of a legal duty, to knowingly and willfully violate such warning and approach or remain within 25 feet of the first responder with the intent to:(1) Impede or interfere with the first responder’s ability to perform such duty;(2) Threaten the first responder with physical harm; or(3) Harass the first responder.(c) A person who violates this subsection is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not less than $50 nor more than $500 or confined in jail not more than one year, or both fined and confined.